Louisiana, session 2026, SB367.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:3310 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3310. Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund to be
known as the "Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund", hereinafter
referred to in this Section as the "fund".
B. The purpose of the fund shall be to support the reclamation,
restoration, and long-term stewardship of lands and watersheds within the
Amite River Basin impacted by sand and gravel mining operations, with
priority given to flood-prone areas and impaired watersheds.
C. After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund
as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
treasurer shall deposit into the fund one hundred percent of the portion of
recurring severance tax revenues collected on sand severed from within the
geographic boundaries of the district that would have been deposited into the
state general fund after allocations of such revenues otherwise required by the
Constitution of Louisiana and the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Monies
designated for the fund and received by the state treasurer from donations,
gifts, grants, or other revenue shall be deposited into the fund.
D. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 367 ENROLLED
the state general fund. Any interest earned on the investment of monies in the
fund shall be credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in
the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
E. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the Coastal Protection
and Restoration Authority for use by the board of commissioners for the Amite
River Basin Drainage and Water Conservation District for use as provided in
Subsection B of this Section.
F. An annual report detailing the receipts, expenditures, and funded
activities of the Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund shall be
submitted by the board to the House Committee on Natural Resources and
Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources by March first
of each calendar year.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.